Illinois, session 104th, SB1450.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 17-114 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/17-114)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 17-114)7    Sec. 17-114. Computation of service. 8    (a) When computing days of validated service, contributors 9shall receive the greater of: (1) one day of service credit for 10each day for which they are paid salary representing a partial 11or a full day of employment rendered to an Employer or the 12Board; or (2) 10 days of service credit for each 10-day period 13of employment in which the contributor worked 50% or more of 14the regularly scheduled hours.15    (b) When computing months of validated service, 17 or more 16days of service rendered to an Employer or the Board in a 17calendar month shall entitle a contributor to one month of 18service credit for purposes of this Article.19    (c) When computing years of validated service rendered, 20170 or more days of service in a fiscal year or 10 or more 21months of service in a fiscal year shall constitute one year of 22service credit.23    (d) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c) of this   SB1450- 2 -LRB104 08592 RPS 18644 b1Section, validated service in any fiscal year shall be that 2fraction of a year equal to the ratio of the number of days of 3service to 170 days.4    (e) For purposes of this Section, no contributor shall 5earn (i) more than one year of service credit per fiscal year, 6(ii) more than one day of service credit per calendar day, or 7(iii) more than 10 days of service credit in a 2 calendar week 8period as determined by the Fund. 9(Source: P.A. 99-176, eff. 7-29-15.)